Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1318.01
State Personnel Board; duties.

The State Personnel Board shall ensure the fair and equitable administration of the State Personnel System by:

(1) Operating as prescribed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services;

(2) Reviewing and approving, by majority vote, rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the personnel division;

(3) Determining the grievability of issues or doing so through the designation of a board member. Issues determined to be not grievable shall be subject to summary dismissal;

(4) Adjudicating grievance appeals and rendering final binding decisions;

(5) Rendering decisions consistent with the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the personnel division;

(6) Reviewing and providing counsel regarding any matter affecting the State Personnel System; and

(7) Performing the actions required pursuant to the State Government Effectiveness Act.

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 15;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 44, § 14.

State Government Effectiveness Act, see section 81-2701.